Montana, session 2025, HB705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-38-205, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-38-205. Organization and operation of county and city central committees. (1) The county
central committee shall meet prior to the state convention of its political party and organize by electing a
presiding officer and one or more vice presiding officers. The gender of the presiding officer and the vice
presiding officer may not be the same. The county central committee shall elect a secretary and other officers
as necessary. It is not necessary for the officers to be precinct committee representatives.
(2) The committee may select managing or executive committees and authorize subcommittees to
exercise all powers conferred upon the county, city, state, and congressional central committees by the election
laws of this state.
(3) The presiding officer of the county central committee shall call the county convention and not
less than 4 days before the date of the county convention shall publish the call in a newspaper published at the
county seat and mail send through electronic mail OR TRADITIONAL MAIL a copy of the call to each precinct
committee representative. If party rules permit the use of a proxy, a proxy may not be recognized unless it is
held by an elector of the precinct of the committee representative executing it.
(4) The county presiding officer of the party shall preside at the county convention. No person
other than a duly elected or appointed committee representative or officer of the committee is entitled to
participate in the proceedings of the committee.
(5) If a committee representative is absent, the convention may fill the vacancy by appointing some
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 705

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0705.2
qualified elector of the party, resident in the precinct, to represent the precinct in the convention.
(6) The county convention shall elect delegates and alternate delegates to the state convention
under rules of the state party. The presiding officer and secretary of the county convention shall issue and sign
certificates of election of the delegates."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 705